Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3634
Urbanizing area planning commission; county provide documentation or materials; when.

In all matters subject to the jurisdiction of the urbanizing area planning commission, upon the request of the city or village, the county shall make available to the city or village within whose area of future growth and development the matter arises any documentation or materials with regard to the matter in the possession of the county.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 34.